District of Columbia statutes.
51-176

Modification of shared work plan.

An employer may modify a shared work plan created pursuant to this subchapter to meet changed conditions if the modification does not substantially modify the basic provisions of the shared work plan as approved by the Director. The employer shall report the changes made to the shared work plan in writing to the Director before implementing the changes. If the original shared work plan is substantially modified, the Director shall reevaluate the shared work plan and may approve the modified shared work plan if it meets the requirements for approval under § 51-174. The approval of a modified shared work plan shall not affect the expiration date originally set for that shared work plan. If substantial modifications cause the shared work plan to fail to meet the requirements for approval, the Director shall deny approval to the modifications as provided by § 51-174(d).

History

Oct. 15, 2010, D.C. Law 18-238, § 7, 57 DCR 7181